intl/locales/cs/hyphenation/hyph_cs.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
.a2d1s4
.af3r
.a1f
.ai4č
.ak3ry
.a1kr
.a2l3s
.a1l
.as3k
.a1s
.as3t
.at3at.
.a1t
.ata1t
.bel3h
.1b
.blou3
.b3s4k
.2b1s
.by3l
.ch2
.ct2
.če2r1s3
.1če
.ču3c
.1ču
.de2p3t
.1de
.de1p2
.do3č
.1d2o
.do3v
.ds1m3
.2d1s2
.1ďa2
.ea2
.ef3l
.e1f
.eg3r
.e1g
.ei3g2
.e1k3l
.e3k3r
.el3er
.e1le
.el3s1h
.e2l1s
.e2n1s3
.e1p1p3
.e1p
.es3t
.e1s
.é1p1
.é1
.fi2l1t3
.1f
.fi1l
.ge1s3
.1g
.goz3
.hos3l
.ho1s
.hy2z3
.i1h1
.in3ea
.i1ne
.in3el.
.i1s3
.í1l2i3
.í1s1
.ja3a
.1ja
.js3m
.2j1s
.leg3r
.le1g
.li4št.
.1l2i
.li3št
.li1š
.2l1s2
.2l1š2
.lus3t3
.l2u
.lu1s
.m1d2
.1m
.m2i4a
.mi1g3
.mo4u
.2m1s2
.na3m
.1na
.n2a3v
.ná3h
.1ná
.ne3č
.1ne
.ne3i
.ne3t1k2
.ne1t
.obe3l
.o1b
.ob4li1t
.ob3l
.ob1l2i
.ob3ř2
.ode3j
.o1de
.o1d3i
.od4ran
.od3ra
.o1dr
.od3rá
.on3ai
.o3na
.os3t3r
.o1s
.o3t3rel
.o1t
.ot4ro1ci
.ot3ro
.ot3ru
.ož2
.po3č
.1p
.po3v
.p1s4
.re3e
.re3o1p
.roc4
.ro3cko
.3roc1k
.ro3c1k1u
.ro3č4ko
.roč1k
.ru3b
.rý1
.se3m1n
.1s
.se1m
.se3t1k2
.se1t
.si3a1nu
.s2ia
.sk2
.st2
.s3t4r2a1v
.s3t4rel
.st4re1š
.st4ri4h4n
.st1ri
.stri1h
.št2
.1š
.ště3d1
.š1tě
.uc2
.uk2
.u1s2
.1us4p2
.u1š2
.u1t2
.u2v4n
.u1v
.uz4m2
.uz3re
.u1zr
.vúc3k
.1v
.3vú
.vú3c2
.vý1
.x2a3c
.1xa
.y2ia3
.1za3
.zd2
.z1ú1
.zú3p
a1aa
aa3aj
aa3a1l
aa3a1s
a1ač
a1ad2
a1a1f
a3ah.
aa1h
a1ai
a1ak
aa4ke
aa4ki
aa4ko
aa4ky
2a1a1m
aa4na
a3a2n1d
a3a2n1h
a2a4ni
aa4nu
a3anx
aa4ny
a1ao
a1a1p
a1aq
a1ar
aa4ra
aa4re
aa4ru
aa4rů
aa4ry
aas3t
aa1s
a1a1š
a1a1t
a1au
a4a1v
a1a1w
2a1ay
a1a1z
aba1š3
a1b
a4be1b
ab3lí
ab3lo
a4b1l2u
abri3c
ab1ri
ab3r1m
abs3kí
a2b1s
ab3sk
3abso
abs3t
a2b1š2
a3b1t4
aby3j
a3bz
2ac
a3cá
a1c1c
a1c1d
ace3c
a1ce
a1cé1
a4ch.
a3c2h1d
a3ché1
a3chí
a3chl
a3chľ1
a3ch1m
a3c2h2ň
a3chř2
a3ch1t
a3chů
a3chú
aci3á1n
a1ci
a1c1j
a2c2k1t4
ac1k
a3cl.
a3c1la
a3c1lí
a3clo
a3c1l2u
a3c1ly
a1cr
ac3ro1m
a1c1s
a3c1ta
a3c2t1b
a4c1te
a3c2t1f
ac3t1m
a3c3tr
a3c2t1s
a1cw
a1c1z
2ač.
2ač1k
a1č1m
ač3re
a1čr
a3čs.
a2č1s
a1č1t2
a4č1ti
ad3a1de
a1d2a
3ada1p
a2d1b
4adí
3ad1j4
a1dĺ
ad3m
3adoc
a1d2o
ad3ra
a1dr
ad3ru
ad3už
a1du
a1d1v2
a1ď
aebi3
ae1b
ae1c
aeg3el
ae1g
ae2h
a3e3le
a3e2l1k
a3en1g
aeo3
ae2r
a3er.
ae3r1m
ae4si
ae1s
aes3t
a1e2v
a1ex
af2j
a1f
af3la
af3lo
af3tů
a2ft
a2fx
age1b3
a1g
a2gh
ag3há
ag3he
ag3h1l
ag3ho
ag1l
ag3ran
3ag3re
ag3ro
ag4u
4agů
a2g1w
a1h
a4hlý
ah2ľ1
a4h3re
a2h1t
ah3v2
ai4čo
ai2e
ai3g2
ai1ll3o
ai1l
a4il1l
a3i2n1d
aint4r
ai2n1t
ai3p
a3ivi1s
ai1v
ai1x1
a3j1de
aj1d
a1jď
aj3i1p
a1ji
a1j1m
a1j4o
aju4n
a1ju
a1j1ž
a3k2a
a1ká
a3k2d
a1ké1
4akh
a1kí
a1kl
ak3lé1
a1k1ň
a1ko
akou3z
ak3ra
a1kr
ak3r2ia
ak2ri
ak3ri1s
ak3rín
ak3ro
1a1kř2
ak3ře
3aksá
a2k1s
aktů3
a2k1t
3aku1t
a1ku
a1k3va
ak1v
a1ky
a1ký
a1l
al3asa
ala1s
al3at1t
ala1t
al1h
ali3g
a1l2i
al3isl
ali1s
all3ame
al1l
alla1m
al1ly3
alost3
a1lo1s
a2lr
a2l1š2
alus3t3
al2u
alu1s
al3y1a1m
a1ly
alya2
a2ly3o
a1ľú
aľ1
3ami1v
a1m
a2m1m
a2m1n
a3m2ň
amo3uc
amo3uč
3ampé1
a2m1p
amp3l
am3p1t
a3mr
am3ra1ď
ams3kí
a2m1s
am3sk
ams3t
amš3t
a2m1š
3am2t1k2
a2m1t
a2mů
a3můž
an3ami
a1na
ana1m
3an2d1c
a2n1d
3an1dě
and4roc
an1d1r
and4rom.
andro1m
and4ruc
and4ru1s
and3u1p
an1du
ane4j
a1ne
an3e2n1d
an3e1ro
2a1ni
a3nni1s
a2n1n
an1ni
2a3no
3ano1š
a1nô
ans3c2r
a2n1s
ans3kí
ans3u
anš3p2
a2n1š
ant3r
a2n1t
an3ud
a1nu
an3y1v
a1ny
3an3z1s2
an1z
a2ňe1
a1ň
a2ňj
a2ň1m
a2ň1t
a2ňu
a1o1b
ao4b3l
ao2c
a1oč
a1od
a1o2h
ao3in
ao4i1z
a1o1k
a1o1p
ao3p1c
ao2ř
a1o1s
a3ost
aos3t3ř
a3o2t1c
ao1t
2aow
ao2z
3ap4i1ra
a1p
ap3je
ap2j
2apl
a3p1m
a3p1ň
3apo1k2
a2p1p
apri3o
ap1ri
ap3ro1b
ap3rů
a3p1š
apy1
a1ra
ar3aga
ara1g
a1rá
a4rá1š
ar3dž
a3re
a1ré1
ar3f
a1rí
ar2j4
ar3m1b
ar1m
a3ro
a3ro4c1k
aro3u1s
ar4pů
ar1p
arš3t
a2r1š
ar3th2
a2rt
ar3t1l
3art1ri
ar1tr
a1ru
a1rů
arů1s3
a3rvan
ar1v
a1ry
a1rý
a1řa
a1řá
a1ř2č
a1ře
a1ři
a1ří
a3řk1no
ař1k
ař2k1n
a1ř1v
as4chi
a1s
asch2
a2s1č2
a1se4p1s
ase1p
a2s1f2
a2s3h1m
3asij
as3i2n1t
as3ké1
as3k1k
as4kr
as4ku1j
as1ku
as3ký
as4ml
as1m
a3so
as3rá
as3rd
as3ro
as3tan
as3tĺ
3a2st1m
as3t3rel
astri1h4
ast1ri
ast4rihl
ast4riho
asu3c
as4vi
as1v
asy3ř
aš2i
a1š
aš3pl
aš1p2
aš4pu
aš3ta
aš3tí.
a1t
3a4tei
a1te
at4el
2ath
a2tj
2a2t1k2
at1l
a2t1ľ1
at4ľo
at4ra1m
a3t4r2a1v
at3rá1n
a3t3rel
at3re1m
at3rín
at3ro
at3ru1m
at3ru1š
at3ří
at3sk
a2t1s
a2t1š2
at4tě
at1t
at4t1l
att3ro
a2ť1c
a1ť
a2ť1k
a2ť1m
a2ť1t
a2ťů
au1a
au3in
a1u1j
au3lla
aul1l
1au1p
a1us3p2
au1s
aus3t
aust3r
au4th
au1t
aut3r
a1už
a1ů
a1úh1
a1úk2
aú3le
a1ú1p
a1ú1r
a1úř
a1ú2s1
a1út
2a1v
a4v1ču
a2vd
av3e1g
a3vh
a2v1m2
avo3uh
avou3
av3ru
a3vst
a2v1s2
a3vů3re
a1w
aw3a1b
a2wr
a1x
2ax.
a1ya
aya3a2
ay1c
ay3eur
ayeu1
a1y1l
ay3oc
a3yo1t2
ays3k
ay1s
ay1š1
a3yt
ay3th
a1z
az4a3k
a1za
az3az.
a1za3z4
az4dú
az3d2v2
3aze3p2
a1ze
azi3o1m
a1zi
a2zj
a2zk2
az4líc
az1l
az4lí1m
az4lí1t
a2z1m2
az2p2
a4z2š2
a2zt2
az2v2
ažs3kí
a2ž1s
a2ž1š2
ä1dí
äg1l
ä1g
äh2
ä2j1
äk1l
ä4ku
ä1la
ä1l1l
ä1lo
än2
ä1t2u
ä1t2ú
äť2j
ä1ť
ä2ť1k
äv1l
ä1v
á1a
á4blá
á1b
á4b1lé1
á4b1l2i
á4blí
á4b3lo
á4b1l2u
á4b1ly
á4blý
á2b1s2
ách3l
á2c1k
á2ct
á3ctí
ád3ro
á1dr
á1d1ř
ádš3t
á2d1š2
á1d2v2
ády3ch1m
á1dy
á1dž
á1ď
á1e
áf1l
á1f
á2f1r
á2f2t
á2g1n
á1g
ág1r
á1ha
á1há
á1he
á1hi
áh1l
á1ho
áho1s3
á1hr
á1hř2
á1hu
á2h2v2
áh3vi
á2h3vo
ái1
á2í
á1j
á2jc
á2j1d
á2j3o1k
á1jo
á4jo1s
á1k
á2kh
ák3le
á2k2m
á2k3ň
ák3ra
á1kr
á1k1ř2
ák2v
á1la
á1lá
1á2l1d
á1le
á2lě
á1lí
3álně1e2
á2l1n
ál1ně
3álněz
á1lo
álo3k
á1l2u
á2ľu
áľ1
á2m1n
á1m
á2m1š2
á1n
á2n1r
á2n1š2
á2n1v
á2ňá
á1ň
á2ň1m
á2ň1s2
á2ň1t
á2ňu
á2ňů
á1o
á3p1ň
á1p
á2p1s
á1ra
ár3a1p
á1rá
á4rá1š
ár1d
á1re
á2rí
á1r2m
á1ro
á2r1š1
á1ru
á1rů
á1ry
á1rý
á1řa
á1ře
á1ři
á1ří
á2ř1k
ás4ek
á1s
ás3ky
ás3ký
ás4lí
á3s3lo
á3s4o1v
ás2p2
ást4r
ás2ť
ás3ťo
áš3le
á1š
áš3t2r
á1ta
á1tá
á1tě
á1tí
át3lo
át4lou
áto3v1n
á1to
áto1v
á1t1r
át4rá1š
á1t2u
á2tů
á2t1v
á1u2
á2vč
á1v
áv2d
áv2š2
á1wa
á1z2r
áz3ro
á1z1v2
1b
ba4ad2
1ba3b1b
1ba1b
ba4by1d
ba3cko
b2ac
bac1k
ba3dú
ba3e2r
ba2l3m
ba1l
ba2ľ1
ba3n1n
ba2o
bas3k
ba1s
bas3t
ba4t1m
ba1t
ba3tt.
bat1t
b1ä1ť
bás3ká
bá1s
2b1b
b3ba1s
b2bé1
bb3lo
bb3r1k
2b1c
b3c1f
bcr1
2b1č
b1d
2b1de
2b1di
3b2dí
2b1d2o
2b1dr
bd3ro
b1ď
b2ea
be2a4c
be3an
be3dř
be4d1ří
bef3a
be1f
be1h2
b2ei
be3i1d
be3ie
be3i1g2
be3ij
be3i1l
be3i1m
be3in
be3ir
be3i1s
be3j1d
be3j1m
be3l1l
be3m
be1o2
be3p2
be3rra
ber1r
b2e1s
beš3t
be1š
1be3u3b
beu1
be3uk2
be3u1š
be3u1t
be3v
b2ey
be3zdí
bez3o1s
be1zo
bez3r
bez3t2
bě3t3a
béo1
bé1
2b1f
b2gh
b1g
2b1h
bhe1
b2h1f
bi3a1p
b2ia
1bi2b
bib3l
big3i
bi1g
bi4g1n
bi1k4r
bi1k
b2i1l
bi1ll3o
b4il1l
b1i1m
bi2ň
bi3o1ly
bi3om.
bio1m
b3ir1g
bist4re
bis3t3r
bi1s
bist4ro1m
bi4t3l
bi1t
2b1j
b4j3a1d
b1ja
bj3o1s
b1jo
2b1k2
3bl.
b3l2ac
b3lač
b3lá1k
b3lea
b3leč
3bled
b3le1m
b3let.
ble1t
b3leta
b3le1to
b1lé1
3bli1ni
b1l2i
b3lín
b3lo1v
2b1ló
b1lô
b3l1t
b1l2u
blu3e1t
2b1lů
b1lú
b3l1v
2b1m
2b1n
bnod4
b1no
bnů1s3
b1nů
2b1ň
bo2a
bo4b3l
bo1b
bo3cl
bo3d1m2
bo1d3r
bo3d1ř
boe1
bo4o1g
b4o1ro
bo3r1r
b3ouw
bo3x1t
bo3xy1
bo1z
2b1p
b2p1s
b3rač
b4ra1g
b3ra1h
b3rai
b3rak
b3ra1l
b3rata
bra1t
b3ra2t1n
b3ra1to
b3r2a1v
b4ra1x
b3ra1z
b3rá1no
brá1n
b1re
b1ré1
b4rí.
b3rín
b3rí1t
bro3cko
b3roc1k
bro3c1k1u
b3ron
b3ro1ň
b3roo
b3ro1s
bro3z
brs3k
b2r1s
brs3l
br3t3v
b2rt
b3rua
1b3ru1b
b3rud
b3ru1j
b1rů
brů1s3
brú4c2
bř2
2b1řa
b1řá
b3ře.
b3řej
b3ře1le
b3řen
b1ři
b1ří
2b1s
1b2s1b
bs2c
b3sk
bs4k2a
bs4ke
bs3lú
bs2n
bs2p2
b1s2s
b4st.
bs4ti1p
bs1ti
bs4to
bst3re
bs3t2ú
2b1š
b2šl
bš3ta
bš3t2r
bš2ť
2b1t
bt3re
2b1ť
b4u
bu4lle
bul1l
b1us3p2
bu1s
bu2s3q
bu3tl
bu1t
bů3re
bů2s
bú3c2
b1úz
bü3c1k
2b1v
bvy2
2bw
b4war
b1we
bya2
2by1č
by3j4st
by1j
by2j1s
by1k
by1r2
by1s1
2bz
b2z2c
bz1d
bz3dú4
bz2r
b2zu
b1z2v2
bz4z
2b1ž
1ca
ca1a
ca3cl
c2ac
ca3d1b
ca3d1d
ca4m1d
ca1m
cas3t
ca1s
cat4r
ca1t
1cá
2c1b
c3bsd
c2b1s
c1c
cca2n1n3
c1ca
c4ce1m
c1ce
c4c4le
1cc1s2
c1č
c1d
c1di1
cd3o1ra
c1d2o
c1d1r
c1du1
1ce
ce1a
ce3an
ce4a3no
2ceá
ceboo4
ce1b
ce3chl
ce3c1l
ce1cu4
ce4ja.
ce1ja
ce3l1l
ce4m1j2
ce1m
cen1ci3
ce2n1c
ce3n1ni
ce2n1n
ce3o1b
ce3o1k2
ce3o1s
ce1ri3
2ce1ť
ce1ú2
ce3zd
cě2
2c1f
2c1g
cg3re
3cha
1chá
2ch1b
3chch
1che
1c2h1h
1chi
4c2h1k
3chl.
ch3l2a1v
ch3le.
2chn
c2h2ň
1ch2o
ch3oby
cho1b
1chó
4c2h1p
3chr
ch3ra1l
ch2ra
2c2h1s2
3ch1tě.
ch1t
3ch3tíc
1chu
3chvi
ch2v2
3chví
1chy
1chý
1ci
cie3n1n
cif4rá
ci1f
ci1i
ci3k1n
ci1k
cini3u
ci1ni
cino3i
ci1no
cis3a
ci1s
cis3l
ci1š2
1cí
cí3d1m
c1j
c4j3a1d
c1ja
cje1s3
c1je
c1k
4ck.
ck3aj
c1k2a
ck2d
3cke1f
c1ke
3cker
2ckh
2c1ki
ck3i1nu
3cki1t
2ckl
c2k1m
3ckn1r
c2k1n
3ckomí
cko1m
ck3o2n1l
ck3ou1t
3ckově
c1k2o1v
2c2k1t
c1k1u
1ck1v
c3ký
1c2k1z2
c1la
c3láč
1c2l1c
c3le1h
c4lel
4c3le1m
2c1lé1
cli3f
c1l2i
cli1p3
c1lí
c4lí1t
c4lon
c4lope
clo1p
c3lova
clo1v
1clô
1c2l1t
c1l2u
c1lý
1c1ľ1
c2ľo
2c1m
c2m1d
cmo2
2c1n
c3na
1co
co4c1k3
co1g2
co3n1na
co2n1n
co4o1g
cot3l
co1t
1cô
1c2p
cp3d1m
c4pe
c3pl
c3po
cp3s
2cq
c2ra
c1ré1
c2ri
c3ro1b
c4ro3bi
c4roi
c3ron.
c4ro1ne
c1ry
c2sá
c1s
c2s1f2
cs4ku1p
cs1ku
2c2s1s
c3sst
c2sů
2csy
2ct.
c1ta
c3tár
c3tá1v
2c1te
3cte2r1n
c2tě
c3tl
c4t1l2i
3c2t1n
2c1to
c2t2p
c3tr
ct3ra
c4t4ra1s
c3t4r2a1v
c4tre
c4t3rod
c4tro1m
c4trow
c4t1ru.
ct3ru1m
c1tř
ct2t
2c1t2u
c4tuu
c1tů
c1t1v
c3tz
2c1ť
1cu
cu3ch
cu3c1l
cuk3rá
cu1kr
cu4lle
cul1l
cu3tl
cu1t
3ců
cůz1
1cú
cú4ch.
cú2c2
cú3ch
1c2v
c3van
c3ví
c3v1k
2cvo
c1x
1cy
cyk1
cy4ko
cy1p1
cy1s1
cý2
c1z
cza4m
c1za
c3z1c
cz3n
c2z3s2
1ča
č2a1c
ča4c1k
ča1f1
ča3i1v
ča1k3l
čapoch3
ča1p
čapo1c2
čas3tě
ča1s
1čá
2č1b
č1c
1čch
č4chi
č4chu
č1č
č1dí
č1d1p4
1če
če3chl
če3ch3r
če4hl
če1h
čes3k
če1s
češ3t
če1š
če4ví
če1v
2č2f1
č1g2
č1ho
č1hu
1či
či1b4
čis3l
či1s
čis3tě
1čí
3čín
čís3i
čí1s
č2j
č1k
čk1l
čk4lé1
č3ko
1čl
č1la
2č1l2i
1č2má
č1m
č2mě
č3mí
č2my
č1n
1čo
čo1k4
čon1g3
čos4k
čo1s
1č2p
č3pa
1čr
č1ra
2č1s
č2sh
čs3kí
č2s1s
č1š1
č1t2
1čt.
1čta
1č2tl
1čtr
č2tř
č2tů
1č2t1v
1č1ty
1ču
ču1c
1čů
čú3c2
1čú1ť
čva4
č1v
čy1
1čz
č1ž
1d2a
da3a
da3ct
d2ac
da3i1k
da3i1z
d3a2l1p
da1l
da4m1j2
da1m
da3r1r
d3art.
da2rt
da1zi3
da1z
dä1
1dá
d2bá
d1b
d3b1b
2dbe
d3b1h
4dbuy
db4u
2d1c
dc3d
dch2
3d2chn
d2ct
2d1č
dčís4lí1m
d1čí
dčí1s
dčís1lí
d1d
dd3a2rt
d1d2a
d1d2l
dd2ř
d2d1s3
dd2v2
d1ď
1de
de3a1m
de3an
de1e2
3deer
de3ft
de1f
de4h1t
de1h
de3ia
de3i1d
dei3g2
de3j1di
dej1d
de3jmi
dej1m
de3jmo
de3kd
de3m
dem3ose
demo1s
de3o1b
de3o1ny
de1p2
de3p1n
dep3t3ec
de2p1t
dep1te
d2er
des4ra
de1s
det3v
de1t
3deu1
de3vč
de1v
de1z
de1z3o
1dě
1dé1
2d1f
d1f2f
dfil1t4e
dfi1l
dfi2l1t
df2l
dfo2
d2f2s
d2f2t
4dge
d1g
d2gi
d2g1n
d2g1w
d1h2
dh3ci
d2h3d
d2hí
d3h1k
2dho
dho3c
dh3z
1di
di3an.
d2ia
di3a1ne
di3ák.
diá1k
di3ch
di3el
d3ig1n
di1g
d3ihr
di1h
d3i2n1d
di3o2v1s2
dio1v
di3p
di4p1s
dist4re.
dis3t3r
di1s
dist4rec
d3is1ť
di3ur
1dí.
3díc
1díč
1dí1h
1dí1k
1díl
2dí1m
1dín
1dír
1dí2š
1dí1t
1dí1v
1díž
d1j4
d1je2
d2j1p
2d1k2
dk3m
dk4rú
d1kr
dk4ú1
1d1l
dle3e
dl4ha.
dl1ha
dli3š
d1l2i
dm3ač
d1m
dm3ad
dm3a1p
dm3ase
dma1s
dm3aše
dma1š
dm3atř
dma1t
1d2m1d
dmi3l
3dmou
dm2r1š3
3dmu1t
2d1n
2d1ň
1d2o
do1a2
d3o4b3l
do1b
d3oboj
d3ob3ra
d4ob4ra1ť
d3o2by1č
do3c4k3a
doc1k
do3c4ke
do3ckl
do3cko
do3c2k1s
do3c1k1u
do1c3r
do3c1t1v
d3oč1n
do3č1t2
d3od1d
do3d1n
d3o1dr
do1h2
do1i
do3j1m
d3o1ke
do1k
do3o2d
do3o1k
3do1p
do3p1n
d3or1l
d3oso
do1s
3dosu
do3t
dot4r
dou3b
do3uč
do3uh
do3uk
do3u1m
do3upr2
dou1p
do3uší
dou1š
do3už
do3vč
do1v
do3v1p2
do4xů
do1z2
do1zi3
1dö
dô1l
d1p4
dpo3č
d2p1s
1dr
d3ra.
d3rad
d4ra1h
d3ra1l
d4ra1p
d3ra1s
d3ra1š
d4ray
d3ra1z
d4raž
d3rác
d3ráč
d3rád
d3rál
d3rbo
dr1b
d4r1c
d1re
dre3o
d1ré1
d3rky
d2r1k
d2r1l
d3roc
d4ro1cu
d3ro1če
d3rod
d3ro1f
d3ro1k
d4roľ1
d3roo
drop3i
dro1p
d3ro1s
d3ro1š
d3ro1t
d3rou
d3roz
dro3z1l
d3rož
d2rö
d3ruč
d4ru1f
d3ru1m
d3ru1š
d1rů
drů1s3
d2rú
d1ry
d3rý
d2rz
dr3z2b
4dř.
d1řa
d1řá
3d3ře.
d3řeč
3dře1p
d1ři
3dři1m
d1ří
3dří1t
1d1řo
2d1s2
dsá3z
d2s1b
ds3č2
d1se1s4
d2s1f2
ds3ko1p
d3sko
ds3ľ1
ds3ml
ds1m
ds1p4
dst2
ds3t4rel
dst1ri4
ds3u1p
ds2z1
2d1š2
dš4í
dš3ťu
dš1ť
2d1t
d4t3lá
dt3ro
d2t1t
2d1ť
1du
du3á1n
du2b3l
du1b
d3u1či
du1dá3
du1f2
du4l1l
d3umí
du1m
dup4lo1v
du1p
du1ri3
dus3t
du1s
du2s4t1m
1dů1
2dů1b
dů4rá
dů4re
1dú1b
dú3c2
dú4ch.
dú3ch
dú4c1k
dú1k2
dú4ku
d1ú1m
d1ú2n
1dúř
1dúz
1dü
d1v2
3dv2ac
3dvak
3dvan
2dvá
d3vč
2dvl
d3v1s2
d2v2u
d2v1v
2dvý
d2vž2
2d1w
1dx
1dy
dy3k1t
dy3l
dy2s3
1dý
d3z2
dz4g
dzi4o1kr
d1zi
dzi3o3k2
d2z4ny
4dž.
1d1ža
dža1s3
4džác
d1žá
d2ž2b2
1d2že
3dži.
d1ži
dži3o
d2ží
2d1žr
d2ž2t
1d1žu
1džů
2d1ž2v
1ďa
ďa2ď
ďa1n3a
ďa2š
1ďá
ďá4bl
ďá1b
ď1c
1ďh
2ď1k
ď1l
ď1n
1ďo
ďovi3
ďo1v
ď1t
ďů1
ďú1
ď1z
ď1ž
each3i1t
e2ac
ea1chi
ea3c1ti
e3a1d2a
e3ad3m
ea1d3u
e3a1d1v2
e1ae
e1a1g
e1ak
e3a2l1k
ea1l
e3a2l1p
e3ama
ea1m
e3a2m1b
e3a2m1p
e3a1ni
ea1p2
eas3tr
ea1s
e3asu
